Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 88.16.190 and 2019 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered, of greater than ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000 deadweight tons shall be prohibited from proceeding beyond a point east of a line extending from Discovery Island light south to New Dungeness light, unless authorized by the United States coast guard, pursuant to 33 C.F.R. Sec. 165.1303.(2)(a)(i) An oil tanker of ((forty))40,000 to ((one hundred twenty-five thousand))125,000 deadweight tons may operate in the waters east of a line extending from Discovery Island light south to New Dungeness light and all points in the Puget Sound area, including but not limited to the San Juan Islands and connected waterways and the waters south of Admiralty Inlet, to the extent that these waters are within the territorial boundaries of Washington, only if the oil tanker is under the escort of a tug or tugs that have an aggregate shaft horsepower ((equivalent to))of at least 3,000 or five percent of the deadweight tons of the escorted oil tanker, whichever is greater.(ii) Effective September 1, 2020, the following may operate in Rosario Strait and connected waterways to the east only if under the escort of a tug or tugs that have an aggregate shaft horsepower equivalent to at least five percent of the deadweight tons of a ((forty thousand))40,000 deadweight ton oil tanker: (A) Oil tankers of between ((five thousand))5,000 and ((forty thousand))40,000 deadweight tons; and (B) both articulated tug barges and towed waterborne vessels or barges that are: (I) Designed to transport oil in bulk internal to the hull; and (II) greater than ((five thousand))5,000 deadweight tons.(iii) The requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection: (A) Do not apply to vessels providing bunkering or refueling services; (B) do not apply to a towed general cargo deck barge; and (C) may be adjusted or suspended by rule by the board of pilotage commissioners, consistent with RCW 88.16.260(1)(c).(b) An oil tanker, articulated tug barge, or towed waterborne vessel or barge in ballast or when unladen is not required to be under the escort of a tug.(c) A tanker assigned a deadweight of less than ((forty thousand))40,000 deadweight tons at the time of construction or reconstruction as reported in Lloyd's Register of Ships is not subject to the provisions of RCW 88.16.170 and 88.16.180.(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Articulated tug barge" means a tank barge and a towing vessel joined by hinged or articulated fixed mechanical equipment affixed or connecting to the stern of the tank barge.(b) "Oil tanker" means a self-propelled deep draft tank vessel designed to transport oil in bulk. "Oil tanker" does not include an articulated tug barge tank vessel.(c) "Towed general cargo deck barge" means a waterborne vessel or barge designed to carry cargo on deck.(d) "Waterborne vessel or barge" means any ship, barge, or other watercraft capable of traveling on the navigable waters of this state and capable of transporting any crude oil or petroleum product in quantities of ((ten thousand))10,000 gallons or more for purposes other than providing fuel for its motor or engine.--- END ---